Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1806
Metropolitan transit authority; revenue bonds and certificates; issuance; terms and conditions; trust agreements.

The authority shall have the continuing power to borrow money for the purpose of acquiring any transportation system and necessary cash working funds, or for reconstructing, extending, or improving its transportation system or any part thereof, and for acquiring any property and equipment useful for the reconstruction, extension, improvement, and operation of its transportation system or any part thereof. For the purpose of evidencing the obligation of the authority to repay any money borrowed as aforesaid, the authority may pursuant to resolution adopted by the board from time to time issue and dispose of its interest-bearing revenue bonds or certificates. It may also from time to time issue and dispose of its interest-bearing revenue bonds or certificates to refund any bonds or certificates at maturity, or pursuant to redemption provisions, or at any time before maturity with the consent of the holders thereof. All such bonds and certificates shall be payable solely from the revenue or income to be derived from the transportation system, from such tax receipts as may be herein authorized, and from such grants and loans as may be received. Such bonds and certificates may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times as may be fixed by the board, may bear interest at such rate or rates as may be fixed by the board, payable semiannually, may be in such form, may carry such registration privileges, may be executed in such manner, may be payable at such place or places, may be made subject to redemption in such manner and upon such terms with or without premium as is stated on the face thereof, may be authenticated in such manner, and may contain such terms and covenants as may be provided in such resolution. Notwithstanding the form or tenor thereof and in the absence of an express recital on the face thereof that they are nonnegotiable, all such bonds and certificates shall be negotiable instruments. Pending the preparation and execution of any such bonds or certificates, temporary bonds or certificates may be issued with or without interest coupons as may be provided by resolution of the board. To secure the payment of any or all of such bonds or certificates, and for the purpose of setting forth the covenants and undertakings of the authority in connection with the issuance thereof, and the issuance of any additional bonds or certificates, as well as the use and application of the revenue or income to be derived from the transportation system, and from such tax receipts as may be herein authorized, and from any grants or loans, as provided in the Transit Authority Law, the authority may execute and deliver a trust agreement or agreements. No lien upon any physical property of the authority shall be created by such trust agreement or agreements. A remedy for any breach or default of the terms of any such trust agreement by the authority may be by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings in any court of competent jurisdiction to compel performance and compliance therewith. The trust agreement may prescribe by whom or on whose behalf such action may be instituted.

Laws 1957, c. 23, § 6, p. 165;

Laws 1972, LB 1275, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 1191, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 17.